test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-anikwacas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - anikwacâs - ok : # -m animate noun, squirrel
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Obv: anikwacâsa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [anikwacâsis, anikwacâsisis]
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [anikwacâsisak, anikwacâsisisak]

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicanikwacâsimis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicanikwacâsimis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicanikwacâsimisinân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicanikwacâsimisinaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicanikwacâsimisiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicanikwacâsimisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg:  kicanikwacâsimisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicanikwacâsimisinânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicanikwacâsimisinawak
